Utah statutes.
20A-11-1406.    Enforcement of part -- Attorney general.
(1)  Subject to the requirements of Subsections (2) and (3), the attorney
general may bring an action to require the labor organization to comply with
the requirements of this part.
(2)  Before bringing an action under Subsection (1), the attorney general
shall:
(a)  notify the labor organization in writing of the precise nature of the
violation of this part; and
(b)  give the labor organization 10 days to cease and desist the violation of
this part.
(3)  The attorney general may not bring an action under Subsection (1) if the
labor organization:
(a)  ceases and desists from violating this part within 10 days; and
(b)  provides the attorney general with written confirmation that the labor
organization has ceased from engaging in the conduct the attorney general
determined to be a violation of this part.
